Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.170

Complaints—Protests.

(1) All agencies that have original or delegated procurement authority for goods or services must have a clear and transparent complaint process. The complaint process must provide for the complaint to be submitted and response provided before the deadline for bid submissions.

(2) All agencies that have original or delegated procurement authority for goods or services must have a clear and transparent protest process. The protest process must include a protest period after the apparent successful bidder is announced but before the contract is signed.

(3) The director may grant authority for an agency to sign a contract before the protest process is completed due to exigent circumstances.

[ 2012 c 224 s 19.]